Utah statutes.
73-3c-304.   Change in point of discharge.

(1)  The point of discharge of water from a POTW may be changed if the Water Quality Board determines that a change is necessary:

(a)  for treatment purposes;

(b)  to enhance environmental quality;

(c)  to protect public health, safety, or welfare; or

(d)  to comply with:

(i)  rules created by the Water Quality Board in accordance with Section 19-5-104; or

(ii)  the POTW's discharge permit.

(2)  Before changing the point of discharge from a POTW under Subsection (1), the Water Quality Board shall consult with the state engineer.



Enacted by Chapter 179, 2006 General Session

